Montana, session 2025, HB122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 69-4-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-4-101. Use of public right-of-way for utility lines and facilities. A telegraph, telephone, electric
light, natural gas, or electric power line corporation or public body or any other person owning or operating such
a telegraph, telephone, electric light, or electric power line or natural gas pipeline is hereby authorized to install
its respective plants and appliances necessary for service and to supply and distribute electricity and natural
gas for lighting, heating, power, and other purposes and to that end, to construct such the telegraph, telephone,
electric light, or electric power lines or natural gas pipelines, from point to point, along and upon on any of the
public roads, streets, and highways in the state, by the erection of necessary fixtures, including posts, piers,
and abutments necessary for the wires and pipelines. The same shall telegraph, telephone, electric light, or
electric power lines or natural gas pipelines must be so constructed so as not to incommode inconvenience or
endanger the public in the use of said the roads, streets, or highways, and nothing herein shall be so in this
section may be construed as to restrict the powers of city or town councils."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 122
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 122, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 122
INTRODUCED BY L. BREWSTER
AN ACT REVISING RIGHT-OF-WAY LAWS FOR UTILITY LINES AND FACILITIES TO INCLUDE NATURAL
GAS PIPELINES; AND AMENDING SECTION 69-4-101, MCA.